Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-309
Rules and regulations; water-related recreational activities; violation; penalty.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations permitting swimming, bathing, boating, wading, waterskiing, and the use of any floatation device on all or any portion of any area under its ownership or control. Such regulations may include permission for swimming, bathing, boating, waterskiing, wading, the use of floatation devices, and all other water-related recreational activities in all areas or any portion of any specific area under the ownership or control of the commission and may provide for special general conditions for specific swimming, waterskiing, boating, bathing, or wading areas, which regulations and conditions shall be posted at such areas. Any person who swims, bathes, boats, wades, waterskis, or uses any floatation device on all or any portion of any area under the ownership or control of the commission, unless the commission has given permission for such activity in the specific area or portion thereof, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 67.

The Legislature has defined a crime herein and provided a penalty and the delegation of administrative or executive authority for implementation of details does not violate the Constitution. State v. Cutright, 193 Neb. 303, 226 N.W.2d 771 (1975).